src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-taeiqdded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below) There are still problems
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - täiʹdded: # Verb 'to know' - full paradigm
     täiʹdded+V+Inf: täiʹdded
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tääidam
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tääidak
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: täidd
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: täiʹddep
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: täiʹddveʹted
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: täiʹdde
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: tääiʹdet
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tääiʹd
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [taiʹddem]
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [taiʹddiǩ]
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: taaiʹdi
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [taaiʹdim, taaiʹdin]
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [taaiʹdid]
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: taiʹdde
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: taiʹddeš
     täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: täiddam
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+Sg1: [taaiʹdžem]
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+Sg2: [taaiʹdžiǩ]
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+Sg3: [taaiʹdež]
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+Pl1: [taaiʹdžep, taaiʹdžim, taaiʹdžin]
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+Pl2: [taaiʹdžid] 
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+Pl3: [taaiʹdže]
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+Sg4: [taaiʹdžet]
     täiʹdded+V+Pot+ConNeg: [taaiʹdže]
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+Sg1: tääidčem
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+Sg2: tääidčiǩ
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+Sg3: tääidči
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+Pl1: [tääidčim, tääidčin, tääidčep]
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+Pl2: tääidčid
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+Pl3: tääidče
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+Sg4: tääidčeš
     täiʹdded+V+Cond+ConNeg: tääidče
     täiʹdded+V+Imprt+Sg2: tääiʹd
     täiʹdded+V+Imprt+Sg3: tääidas
     täiʹdded+V+Imprt+Pl1: täiʹddep
     täiʹdded+V+Imprt+Pl2: täiʹdded
     täiʹdded+V+Imprt+Pl3: täiddaz
     täiʹdded+V+Imprt+ConNeg: tääiʹd
     täiʹdded+V+Imprt+ConNegII: taiddu      # taiddu
     täiʹdded+V+Actio+Ess: täiʹddmen
     täiʹdded+V+Actio: täiʹddem
     täiʹdded+V+Act+PrsPrc: taiʹddi
     täiʹdded+V+Act+PrfPrc: täiddam
     täiʹdded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: taiddum         # taiddum
     täiʹdded+V+VAbess: [tääiʹdkani, tääiʹdǩeännai]
     täiʹdded+V+Ger+Ess: tääiʹdeen
     täiʹdded+V+Ger+Instr: tääiʹdeeʹl
     täiʹdded+V+Act+PrfPrc: täiddam
